Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,121
Judge; salary increase; when effective.

Sections 24-301.01 and 43-2,120 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation for judges of the separate juvenile courts as soon as such change may become operative under the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1965, c. 110, § 3, p. 434;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-234.01;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 78.